Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.331 is amended to read:
343.331. ORS 343.322, 343.324, 343.326 and 343.328 do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any abbreviated school days that are a component of discipline imposed in compliance  with
ORS 339.250, 339.252 or 343.155 (5) or that  are the result of a placement made as provided by ORS
343.177.
(2) A student’s exclusion from schools due to the student’s immunization status  or due to the
student’s exposure to a restrictable disease, as provided by ORS 433.235 to 433.284.
(3) The exclusion of a student from schools or the closure  or restriction of access to schools due
to actions taken under a public health emergency authorized under ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(4) A student who has fulfilled all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2), when the parent or foster parent has agreed to the abbreviated
school day program.
(5) A student enrolled in a program described in ORS  336.585, 336.590, 339.129, 343.261, 343.961
(1)(c)(A)(i) or 346.010, if the student has meaningful access  to the same number of hours of instruc-
tion and educational services as the majority of  other students enrolled in the same program as the
student.
(6) A student whose parent or foster parent has notified an education service  district that the
student is being taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher under ORS 339.035.
(7) A student who is excluded from, or limited access to, school due to a court order.
(8) A high school student who is voluntarily enrolled in an alternative education program in
compliance with ORS 336.635, the Expanded Options  Program under ORS 340.005 to 340.090 or an
accelerated college credit program as defined in ORS 340.300, when:
(a) The majority of the students of the program are not students with disabilities;
(b) The student is not  restricted to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority  of stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same program; and
(c) For an  alternative education program in which the student is enrolled under ORS 336.635,
the school district informs  the parent or foster parent, in writing and in a language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent,  that upon written request of the parent or foster parent, the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1558 (SB 1558-INTRO) Page 1
student will be immediately restored to a school that  allows the student to access the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(9) A student who, when registering for classes for a term or semester of a school year,
voluntarily does not schedule a class for  one or more class periods. The provisions of this
subsection apply only if the student is:
(a) In grade 11 or 12 and is on track to fulfill all state requirements  for graduation with
a high school diploma,  as described in ORS 329.451 (2), or a modified diploma, as described
in ORS 329.451 (7), within four years of starting grade 9; or
(b) On track to fulfill all state requirements for graduation  with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (7), by  the
end of the school year  in which the student voluntarily does not schedule a class for one or
more class periods.
(10) Asynchronous instruction if the instruction:
(a) Is for only one class per term or semester;
(b) Satisfies a credit requirement for a  high school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451
(2), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (7);
(c) Is a credit recovery class or is a class not otherwise available to the student;
(d) Is  offered to students on a voluntary basis and is not restricted to only students with
a disability; and
(e) Is accessible to  a student while the student is at school and while staff of the school
are immediately available to the student.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1558 (SB 1558-INTRO) Page 2